Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-928
Board; verify service record.

Subject to the restrictions in the School Employees Retirement Act and to such rules and regulations as the retirement board may adopt, the retirement board shall verify, as soon as practicable after the filing of statements of service, the service claimed in the statements.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 17, p. 644;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2917;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 451, p. 846;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1517;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 563.